Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.890

Board of adjustment—Action final—Writs.

The action by the board of adjustment on an application for a conditional use permit or a variance, or on an appeal from the decision of the zoning adjustor or an administrative officer shall be final and conclusive unless within ten days from the date of said action the original applicant or an adverse party makes application to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of certiorari, a writ of prohibition or a writ of mandamus.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.890. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 89.]